sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej: Vreče za opremo za umetnostno drsanje in hokej; Pripomočki za vadbo umetnostnega drsanja in hokeja; Žogice in ploščki za hokej; Čistila in dezodoranti za hokejsko opremo; Goli za hokej; Zaščitna oprema za hokej; Hokejske sani; Nega hokejske palice; Deli za hokejske palice; Hokejske palice; Deli in dodatki za drsalke; Drsalke
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística: Sacos de equipamento de hóquei e patinagem artística; Auxiliares de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei; Discos e bolas para hóquei; Produtos de limpeza e desodorizantes de equipamento de hóquei; Balizas para hóquei; Equipamento de proteção para hóquei; Trenós de hóquei; Cuidados com stick de hóquei; Peças para stick de hóquei; Sticks de hóquei; Acessórios e peças para patins de gelo; Patins de gelo
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys: Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio įrangos krepšiai; Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Ledo ritulio kamuoliai ir rituliai; Ledo ritulio įrangos valikliai ir dezodorantai; Ledo ritulio vartai; Ledo ritulio apsauginės priemonės; Ledo ritulio rogutės; Ritmušų priežiūra; Ritmušų dalys; Ritmušos; Pačiūžų dalys ir priedai; Pačiūžos
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej: Tašky na vybavení na krasobruslení a hokej; Tréninkové pomůcky na krasobruslení a hokej; Hokejové míčky a puky; Čističe a deodoranty na hokejové vybavení; Hokejové branky; Hokejové chrániče; Sáně na sledge hokej; Péče o hokejky; Díly hokejek; Hokejky; Díly a příslušenství k bruslím; Brusle
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей: Чанти за екипировка за фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Помощни средства за тренировка по фигурно пързаляне и хокей; Топки и шайби за хокей; Почистващи и дезодориращи средства за хокейна екипировка; Врати за хокей; Защитна екипировка за хокей; Шейни за хокей; Грижа за стикове за хокей; Части за стикове за хокей; Стикове за хокей; Части и аксесоари за кънки на лед; Кънки за лед
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey: Sacs d'équipement de patinage artistique et de hockey; Aides à l'entraînement pour le patinage artistique et le hockey; Balles et palets de hockey; Nettoyants et désodorisants pour équipement de hockey; Buts de hockey; Équipement de protection de hockey; Luges de hockey; Articles d'entretien des crosses de hockey; Pièces de crosses de hockey; Crosses de hockey; Pièces et accessoires de patins à glace; Patins à glace
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey: Borse per attrezzatura da pattinaggio di figura e hockey; Ausili per l'allenamento di pattinaggio artistico e hockey; Palle e dischi da hockey; Detergenti e deodoranti per attrezzatura da hockey; Porte da hockey; Attrezzatura protettiva hockey; Slittini da hockey; Manutenzione mazze da hockey; Ricambi per mazze da hockey; Mazze da hockey; Componenti e accessori per pattinaggio su ghiaccio; Pattini da ghiaccio
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko: Taitoluistelu- ja jääkiekkokassit; Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoitteluvälineet; Kiekot ja pallot; Jääkiekkovarusteiden puhdistus- ja raikastusaineet; Jääkiekkomaalit; Jääkiekkosuojat; Jääkiekkokelkat; Jääkiekkomailan hoito; Jääkiekkomailan osat; Jääkiekkomailat; Luistinten osat ja tarvikkeet; Luistimet
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้: กระเป๋าใส่อุปกรณ์ฟิกเกอร์สเกตและฮอกกี้; อุปกรณ์ช่วยในการฝึกสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้; ลูกบอลและลูกยางสำหรับฮอกกี้; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดและดับกลิ่นอุปกรณ์ฮอกกี้; ประตูสำหรับฮอกกี้; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของฮอกกี้; รถแล่นบนลานน้ำแข็งสำหรับฮอกกี้; การดูแลไม้ฮอกกี้; ชิ้นส่วนไม้ฮอกกี้; ไม้ฮอกกี้; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สเก็ตน้ำแข็ง; สเกตน้ำแข็ง
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej: Torbe za opremu za umjetničko klizanje i hokej; Pomagala za vježbanje umjetničkog klizanja i hokeja; Lopte i pakovi za hokej; Sredstva za čišćenje i dezodoriranje opreme za hokej; Golovi za hokej; Zaštitna oprema za hokej; Hokejaške sanjke; Njega hokejaške palice; Dijelovi hokejaške palice; Palice za hokej; Dijelovi i pribor za klizanje na ledu; Klizaljke
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey: Utstyrsbager for kunstløp og hockey; Treningshjelpemidler for kunstløp og hockey; Hockeyballer og -pucker; Rengjøring og luktfjernere for hockeyutstyr; Hockeymål; Beskyttelsesutstyr for hockey; Hockeykjelker; Pleie av hockeykøller; Deler til hockeykøller; Hockeykøller; Deler og tilbehør for kunstløp; Skøyter
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey: Ausrüstungstaschen für Eiskunstlauf & Hockey; Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingshilfen; Hockeybälle & Pucks; Reiniger & Geruchsentferner für Hockeyausrüstung; Hockeytore; Hockey-Schutzausrüstung; Hockeyschlitten; Hockeyschlägerpflege; Hockeyschlägerteile; Hockeyschläger; Schlittschuhzubehör; Schlittschuhe
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey: Udstyrstasker til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Hjælpemidler til kunstskøjteløb og hockey; Hockeybolde og pucker; Rengørings- og lugtfjerningsmidler til hockeyudstyr; Hockeymål; Hockey-beskyttelsesudstyr; Hockeykælke; Hockeystav – pleje; Hockeystav – dele; Skafter til hockeystave; Dele og tilbehør til skøjter; Isskøjter
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey: Tassen voor kunstschaatsen en hockey; Benodigdheden voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining; Hockeyballen en -pucks; Reinigers en verfrissers voor hockeyuitrusting; Hockeydoelen; Beschermende uitrusting voor ijshockey; Hockeysleeën; Verzorging van hockeysticks; Onderdelen voor hockeysticks; Hockeysticks; Schaatsonderdelen en -accessoires; Schaatsen
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei: Genți de echipament pentru patinaj artistic și hochei; Articole antrenament patinaj artistic și hochei; Mingi și pucuri de hochei; Produse de curățare și dezodorizare a echipamentului de hochei; Porți de hochei; Echipamente de protecție pentru hochei; Sănii pentru hochei; Îngrijirea croselor de hochei; Piese pentru crosa de hochei; Crose de hochei; Piese și accesorii pentru patinaj pe gheață; Patine pentru patinaj pe gheață
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu: Túi đựng dụng cụ khúc côn cầu và trượt băng nghệ thuật; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu; Bóng chơi khúc côn cầu và khúc côn cầu trên băng; Chất khử mùi và làm sạch dụng cụ khúc côn cầu; Cầu môn môn khúc côn cầu; Đồ bảo vệ môn khúc côn cầu; Xe trượt băng chơi hockey; Bảo dưỡng gậy hockey; Bộ phận gậy hockey; Gậy chơi khúc côn cầu; Phụ tùng và phụ kiện giày trượt băng; Giày trượt băng
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei: Bolsas de equipamentos de patinação artística e hóquei; Auxílios de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei; Bolas e discos de hóquei; Limpadores e desodorizadores de equipamentos de hóquei; Traves de hóquei; Equipamento de proteção de hóquei; Trenós para hóquei; Manutenção de tacos de hóquei; Peças para tacos de hóquei; Tacos de hóquei; Peças e acessórios para patins para gelo; Patins para gelo
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong: Műkorcsolya és jégkorong felszerelés táskák; Műkorcsolya és jégkorong edzési segédeszközök; Jégkoronglabdák és -korongok; Jégkorong felszerelés tisztítók és szagtalanítók; Jégkorongkapuk; Jégkorong-védőfelszerelés; Jégkorongszánkók; Jégkorongütő-ápolás; Jégkorongütő-tartozékok; Jégkorongütők; Jégkorcsolya-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Jégkorcsolyák
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ: Τσάντες εξοπλισμού καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ και χόκεϊ; Προπονητικά βοηθήματα πατινάζ & χόκεϊ; Μπάλες & μικροί, στρογγυλοί δίσκοι χόκεϊ; Καθαριστικά και αποσμητικά εξοπλισμού χόκεϊ; Τέρματα χόκεϊ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ; Έλκηθρα χόκεϊ; Φροντίδα μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Εξαρτήματα μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Μπαστούνια χόκεϊ; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ πατινάζ πάγου; Παγοπέδιλα
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey: Artistik patinaj ve hokey ekipman çantaları; Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Eğitim Araçları; Hokey Topları ve Pakları; Hokey ekipman temizleyicileri ve koku gidericileri; Hokey Kaleleri; Hokey Koruyucu Ekipmanları; Hokey Kızakları; Hokey Sopası Bakım Ekipmanları; Hokey Sopası Parçaları; Hokey Sopaları; Buz Pateni Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Buz Patenleri
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание: Сумки для экипировки (фигурное катание и хоккей); Тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея и фигурного катания; Хоккейные мячи и шайбы; Средства для чистки и удаления запахов (хоккейная экипировка); Хоккейные ворота; Защитная экипировка для хоккея; Хоккейные сани; Уход за хоккейными клюшками; Детали хоккейных клюшек; Хоккейные клюшки; Детали и аксессуары для коньков; Коньки
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球: 花式滑冰與冰球裝備袋; 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練輔助工具; 曲棍球/曲棍球餅; 冰球裝備清潔劑與除臭劑; 曲棍球門; 曲棍球護具; 曲棍球用雪橇; 曲棍球桿保養用品; 曲棍球桿零件; 曲棍球棍; 溜冰鞋零件/配件; 冰刀鞋
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球: 花样滑冰与冰球装备包; 花样滑冰/冰球训练辅助用品; 冰球/曲棍球; 冰球装备清洁剂与除臭剂; 冰球/曲棍球门; 冰球护具; 冰球雪橇; 冰球/曲棍球杆保养; 冰球/曲棍球杆部件; 冰球/曲棍球杆; 冰刀/冰鞋零件/配件; 溜冰鞋
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej: Torby na sprzęt do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Pomoce treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja; Piłki i krążki hokejowe; Środki do czyszczenia i odświeżania sprzętu hokejowego; Bramki hokejowe; Ochraniacze hokejowe; Sledge hokejowe; Środki do konserwacji kijów hokejowych; Części kijów hokejowych; Kije hokejowe; Części i akcesoria do łyżew; Łyżwy
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品: フィギュアスケート・ホッケー用具バッグ; フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー練習器具; アイスホッケー用ボール・パック; ホッケー用具用クリーナー・消臭剤; アイスホッケー用ゴール; アイスホッケー用プロテクター; アイスホッケー用スレッジ; アイスホッケー用スティックケア用品; アイスホッケー用スティックパーツ; アイスホッケー用スティック; アイススケート靴パーツ・関連用品; アイススケート靴
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej: Tašky na vybavenie na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Tréningové pomôcky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej; Hokejové lopty a puky; Čistiace prostriedky a dezodoranty na hokejové vybavenie; Hokejové bránky; Hokejové ochranné pomôcky; Hokejové sánky; Starostlivosť o hokejku; Diely na hokejky; Hokejky; Časti a príslušenstvo pre korčule; Korčule
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey: Bolsos de equipo para hockey y patinaje artístico; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hockey y patinaje artístico; Discos y pelotas de hockey; Limpiadores y desodorantes para equipo de hockey; Porterías de hockey; Equipo de protección de hockey; Trineos para hockey; Mantenimiento de palos de hockey; Piezas para palos de hockey; Palos de hockey; Accesorios para patines de hielo; Patines de hielo
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키: 피겨 스케이팅 및 하키 장비 가방; 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련 장비; 하키 공/퍽; 하키 장비 클리너 및 탈취제; 하키 골대; 하키 보호 장비; 슬레지하키 썰매; 하키 스틱 관리; 하키 스틱 부품; 하키 스틱; 스케이트 부품/부대용품; 스케이트화
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey: Figure Skating & Hockey Equipment Bags; Figure Skating & Hockey Training Aids; Hockey Balls & Pucks; Hockey Equipment Cleaners & Deodorizers; Hockey Goals; Hockey Protective Gear; Hockey Sledges; Hockey Stick Care; Hockey Stick Parts; Hockey Sticks; Ice Skate Parts & Accessories; Ice Skates
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey: Utrustningsväskor för konståkning och ishockey; Träningshjälpmedel för konståkning och hockey; Hockeybollar och puckar; Rengöring och luktborttagare för ishockeyutrustning; Hockeymål; Skyddsutrustning för hockey; Hockeykälkar; Vård för hockeyklubbor; Delar till hockeyklubbor; Hockeyklubbor; Delar och tillbehör för skridskoåkning; Skridskor